Utah statutes.
41-1a-1224.   Credit for registering an off-highway vehicle as a street-legal all-terrain vehicle.

(1)  Beginning on the date that the division has implemented the division's GenTax system, the division shall provide a credit against the fees and taxes charged to a person registering a street-legal all-terrain vehicle under Title 41, Chapter 1a, Motor Vehicle Act, if:

(a)  the street-legal all-terrain vehicle was registered as an off-highway vehicle under Section 41-22-3 upon being purchased from a dealer licensed under Title 41, Chapter 3, Part 2, Licensing; and

(b)  not more than 30 days have passed since the division issued the off-highway vehicle registration specified under Subsection (1)(a).

(2)  The amount of the credit provided under Subsection (1) shall be the amount of taxes and fees paid by the person to the division for the off-highway vehicle registration described in Subsection (1)(a).



Enacted by Chapter 446, 2013 General Session

